Indiana, session 2026, SB61.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-34.1-10-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A licensee
representing a seller or landlord has the following duties and
obligations:
(1) To fulfill the terms of the agency relationship made with the
seller or landlord.
(2) To disclose the nature of the agency relationship with the
seller or landlord, and redefine and disclose if the relationship
changes.
(3) To promote the interests of the seller or landlord by:
(A) seeking a price or lease rate and contract terms satisfactory
to the seller or landlord; however, the licensee is not obligated
to seek additional offers to purchase or lease after an offer to
purchase or lease has been accepted by the seller or landlord,
unless otherwise agreed between the parties;
(B) presenting all offers to purchase or lease to and from the
seller or landlord immediately upon receipt of the offers
2026 IN 61—LS 6211/DI 148


regardless of whether an offer to purchase or lease has been
accepted, unless otherwise directed by the seller or landlord;
(C) disclosing to the seller or landlord adverse material facts
or risks actually known by the licensee concerning the real
estate transaction;
(D) advising the seller or landlord to obtain expert advice
concerning material matters that are beyond the licensee's
expertise;
(E) timely accounting for all money and property received
from the seller or landlord;
(F) exercising reasonable care and skill; and
(G) complying with the requirements of this chapter and all
applicable federal, state, and local laws, rules, and regulations,
including fair housing and civil rights statutes, rules, and
regulations.
(b) A licensee representing a seller or landlord may not disclose the
following without the informed written consent of the seller or
landlord:
(1) That a seller or landlord will accept less than the listed price
or lease rate for the property or other contract concessions.
(2) What motivates the seller to sell or landlord to lease the
property.
(3) Any material or confidential information about the seller or
landlord unless the disclosure is required by law or where failure
to disclose would constitute fraud or dishonest dealing.
(c) A licensee representing a seller or landlord owes no duties or
obligations to the buyer or tenant except that a licensee shall treat all
prospective buyers or tenants honestly and shall not knowingly give
them false information.
(d) A licensee shall disclose to a prospective buyer or tenant adverse
material facts or risks actually known by the licensee concerning the
physical condition of the property and facts required by statute or
regulation to be disclosed and that could not be discovered by a
reasonable and timely inspection of the property by the buyer or tenant.
A licensee representing a seller or landlord owes no duty to conduct an
independent inspection of the property for the buyer or tenant or to
verify the accuracy of any statement, written or oral, made by the seller,
the landlord, or an independent inspector. This subsection does not
limit the obligation of a prospective buyer or tenant to obtain an
independent inspection of the physical condition of the property. A
cause of action does not arise against a licensee for disclosing
information in compliance with this section.
2026 IN 61—LS 6211/DI 148


(e) Before signing a purchase agreement to sell or transfer
residential property, a licensee representing a seller shall ensure
that the seller does the following:
(1) Provides in writing to the buyer the following warning
statement:
"The Indiana Department of Health strongly recommends
that all homebuyers have an indoor radon test performed
by a certified and licensed radon tester prior to purchase
or taking occupancy and recommends having the radon
levels mitigated if elevated radon concentrations are found.
Elevated radon concentrations can easily be reduced by a
certified and licensed radon mitigator. Every buyer of any
interest in residential real property is notified that the
property may present exposure to dangerous levels of
indoor radon gas that may place the occupants at risk of
developing radon induced lung cancer. Radon, a Class A
human carcinogen, is the leading cause of lung cancer in
nonsmokers and the second leading cause overall. The
seller of any interest in residential real property is
required to provide the buyer with any information on
radon test results for the dwelling.".
(2) Discloses in writing to the buyer any knowledge the seller
has of radon concentrations in the dwelling, including:
(A) whether any radon tests have occurred on the real
property;
(B) the most current records or reports or both pertaining
to radon concentrations in the dwelling;
(C) a description of any radon concentrations, mitigation,
or remediation occurring or that has occurred in the
dwelling; and
(D) information regarding any radon mitigation system
installed in the dwelling, including system descriptions and
documentation.
(3) Provides the buyer with a guide on radon, testing, and
mitigation published by the Indiana department of health.
The radon disclosure requirements under this section apply to the
transfer of any interest in residential real estate, whether by sale,
exchange, deed, contract for deed, lease with an option to purchase,
or any other option. The buyer shall acknowledge receipt of the
information or materials described in subdivisions (1) through (3)
by signing a notification.
(e) (f) A licensee representing a seller or landlord may:
2026 IN 61—LS 6211/DI 148


(1) show alternative properties not owned by the seller or landlord
to a prospective buyer or tenant and may list competing properties
for sale or lease without breaching any duty or obligation to the
seller or landlord; and
(2) provide to a buyer or tenant services in the ordinary course of
a real estate transaction and any similar services that do not
violate the terms of the agency relationship made with the seller
or landlord.
2026 IN 61—LS 6211/DI 148